District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.18

Continuation of pay; election to use annual or sick leave.

(a)

The District of Columbia government shall authorize the continuation of pay of an employee, as defined in paragraph (1) of § 1-623.01, who has filed a claim for a period of wage loss due to a traumatic injury with his or her immediate superior on a form approved by the Mayor within the time specified in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of § 1-623.22.

(b)

Continuation of pay under this subchapter shall be furnished:

(1)

Unless controverted under rules and regulations of the Mayor;

(2)

For a period not to exceed 45 days for employees hired before January 1, 1980, or for employees who have a claim for compensation for disability pending on December 29, 1994, provided that the period of continuation of pay shall not exceed 21 days for all other employees, beginning 2 years after December 29, 1994; and

(3)

Under accounting procedures and such other rules and regulations as the Mayor may require.

(c)

If a claim under subsection (a) of this section is denied by the Mayor, payments under this section, at the option of the employee, shall be charged to sick or annual leave or shall be deemed overpayments of pay within the meaning of § 5584 of Title 5 of the United States Code or equivalent provisions of this chapter.

(d)

Payments under this section shall not be considered compensation as defined by paragraph (12) of § 1-623.01.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2318, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(w), 27 DCR 2632
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 810(g), 42 DCR 3684

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-623.17.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.18.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.18.